dev/saldo/saldo.verbs.dix
    <pardef n="sl/inta__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>intas</l><r>inta<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>inta</l><r>inta<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>untits</l><r>inta<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>untit</l><r>inta<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>int</l><r>inta<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ants</l><r>inta<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ant</l><r>inta<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>untes</l><r>inta<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="konj"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>unte</l><r>inta<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="konj"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>intande</l><r>inta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>intandes</l><r>inta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>intes</l><r>inta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ints</l><r>inta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>inter</l><r>inta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>intes</l><r>inta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="konj"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>inte</l><r>inta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="konj"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="slinta"><i>sl</i><par n="sl/inta__vblex"/></e>
